Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6592YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2175 Section 1. Section 710.11, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 710.11 Purchase or sale of individual. 3 A person commits a class âCâ felony when the person purchases 4 or sells or attempts to purchase or sell an individual to 5 another person. This section does not apply to a surrogate 6 mother arrangement provided that the surrogate mother receives 7 no monetary consideration or anything of value for agreeing to 8 be artificially inseminated to bear a child and to relinquish 9 all rights regarding that child to another person or couple . 10 For purposes of this section , a âsurrogate mother arrangementâ 11 means an arrangement whereby a female agrees to be artificially 12 inseminated with the semen of a donor, to bear a child, and 13 to relinquish all rights regarding that child to the donor or 14 donor couple. 15